Massachusetts, session 194th, S1309.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, employees of an
airline catering company that holds a commercial services operating agreement or lease with the
Massachusetts Port Authority who perform work related to such agreement or lease on Logan
airport property or off-site shall be paid the same hourly wage as other service workers
including, but not limited to, wheelchair assistants, skycaps, ticket agents, janitorial staff, aircraft
and cabin cleaning and baggage handlers.
For purposes of this requirement, “airline catering” shall include the preparation or
assembly of food, beverages, provisions or related supplies for delivery, and the delivery of such
of 2

items, directly to aircraft at Logan airport or to a location on or near airport property for
subsequent delivery to aircraft.
SECTION 2. Any change in the hourly wage of employees of an airline catering
company necessary to effectuate section 1 shall take effect within 30 days of the effective date of
this act.
of 2